District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.16

Conflict of laws.

The procedures set forth in this subchapter shall prevail over any other subchapter of the Council or provision of District law that might be deemed to be inconsistent with this subchapter.

History

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 17, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.16.